Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202620-320
Transaction related to residential real estate; discriminatory practices prohibited.

(1) Except as exempted by section 20-322, it shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whose business includes engaging in transactions related to residential real estate to discriminate against any person in making available such a transaction or in the terms or conditions of such a transaction because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, familial status, national origin, or military or veteran status.

(2) For purposes of this section, transaction related to residential real estate shall mean any of the following:

(a) The making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial assistance:

(i) For purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining a dwelling; or

(ii) Secured by residential real estate; or

(b) The selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property.

(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person engaged in the business of furnishing appraisals of real property from taking into consideration factors other than race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, familial status, or military or veteran status.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 21;

Laws 2021, LB540, § 21;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 14.